Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF602.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1964HV (1) 91 as/js H.F. 602 Section 1. Section 915.38, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Upon its own motion or upon motion of any party, a court 3 may protect a minor, as defined in section 599.1 , from trauma 4 caused by testifying in the physical presence of the defendant 5 where it would impair the minorâs ability to communicate, by 6 ordering that the testimony of the minor be taken in a room 7 other than the courtroom and be courtroom. The testimony 8 shall be televised by two-way, closed-circuit equipment with 9 both audio and video feeds for listening and viewing in the 10 courtroom. However, such an order shall be entered only upon a 11 specific finding by the court that such measures are necessary 12 to protect the minor from trauma. Only the judge, prosecuting 13 attorney, defendantâs attorney, persons necessary to operate 14 the equipment, and any person whose presence, in the opinion of 15 the court, would contribute to the welfare and well-being of 16 the minor may be present in the room with the minor during the 17 minorâs testimony. The judge shall inform the minor that the 18 defendant will not be present in the room in which the minor 19 will be testifying but that the defendant will be viewing the 20 minorâs testimony through closed-circuit television. 21